Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-1306
Act; implementation and enforcement; rules and regulations.

The department shall be responsible for implementation and enforcement of the Nebraska Registered Apprenticeship Act. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to carry out the act.

Laws 2026, LB847, § 6.
July 18, 2026